District of Columbia statutes.
47-875

Applicability of other provisions to this chapter.

The provisions of Chapter 41, §§ 47-4310 and 47-4311, §§ 47-4431 through 47-4440, and § 47-4452(a) shall apply to this chapter. No other provisions of chapters 42, 43 and 44 shall apply to this chapter.

History

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(m), 50 DCR 896

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).